Illinois, session 104th, HB5305.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pesticide Act is amended by adding 5Section 14.1 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 60/14.1 new)7    Sec. 14.1. Regulation of coated or treated seeds.8    (a) Beginning January 1, 2029, it is unlawful for any 9person to sell, offer for sale, use, or distribute within this 10State any corn, soybean, or wheat seed coated or treated with a 11pesticide containing the active ingredients clothianidin, 12imidacloprid, thiamethoxam, or any other neonicotinoid as 13determined by the Department of Agriculture by rule, unless a 14valid waiver is issued by the Department under subsection (b).15    (b) The Director, in consultation with the Director of 16Natural Resources, may issue a waiver to allow the use of such 17treated seeds for the production of agricultural commodities, 18with the following requirements:19        (1) No waiver shall be valid for more than 2 years.20        (2) A waiver shall be granted only if, at a minimum, 21    the following conditions are met:22            (A) the farm owner completes an integrated pest 23        management training;  HB5305- 2 -LRB104 18431 BDA 31873 b1            (B) the farm owner completes a pest risk 2        assessment and a pest risk assessment report;3            (C) any treated seeds are planted on the farm 4        property or properties identified in the pest risk 5        assessment report; and6            (D) the farm owner maintains current records of 7        the pest risk assessment report and records of when 8        treated seeds are planted, both of which are subject 9        to review upon request by the Department of 10        Agriculture.11        (3) The Department of Agriculture, in consultation 12    with the Department of Natural Resources, shall adopt any 13    necessary rules regarding the waiver process before 14    issuing waivers under this Section.15        (4) The Department of Agriculture shall annually 16    report to the General Assembly on the number of waivers 17    granted.18    (c) Any person who violates any provision of this Section 19or any rule adopted under this Section shall be liable for a 20civil penalty not to exceed $1,000 for each day during which 21such violation continues. For a second violation, such a 22person shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $2,500 23for each day during which such violation continues and may be 24enjoined from continuing the violation. The State's Attorney 25of the county where the violation occurred or the Attorney 26General may bring suit to collect civil penalties and seek   HB5305- 3 -LRB104 18431 BDA 31873 b1injunctions for violations of this Section. Notwithstanding 2any other provision of this Act, a person who violates this 3Section is not subject to criminal penalties under this Act 4for the violation of this Section and is not subject to other 5civil or administrative penalties under this Act for the 6violation of this Section. This Section shall not be construed 7to abrogate or limit any remedy or relief under the common law 8or statute and shall not be construed to provide immunity or 9limit the application of criminal, civil, or administrative 10penalties for violations of other Sections of this Act or of 11any other Act.12    (d) The Department of Natural Resources and the Department 13of Agriculture, in consultation with the University of 14Illinois, shall conduct a study to identify practicable and 15feasible alternatives to the use of pesticides containing the 16active ingredients clothianidin, imidacloprid, thiamethoxam, 17dinotefuran, or acetamiprid. The results of the study shall be 18submitted to the Governor and the General Assembly on or 19before January 1, 2029, and shall be posted on the 20Department's website.